Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.110

Persons with stenomask reporting experience.

Persons with two or more years' experience in stenomask reporting in Washington state as of January 1, 1996, shall be granted a court reporter certificate without examination, if application is made before January 1, 1996.

[ 1995 c 27 s 10; 1989 c 382 s 12.]